Massachusetts, session 194th, H2005.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38B of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(d) Any person in the custody of a correctional facility, including any jail, house of
correction, trial court detention facility or state prison, who commits an assault or an assault and
battery by means of a dangerous weapon upon an officer or other employee, any volunteer or
employee of a contractor in any such facility or any duly authorized officer or other employee of
any such facility engaged in the transportation of a prisoner for any lawful purpose shall be
punished by imprisonment for not more than 2 and one-half years in a jail or house of correction
or for not more than 20 years in a state prison. Such sentence shall begin from and after all
of 2

sentences currently outstanding and unserved at the time of said assault or assault and battery.
For purposes of this subsection, “dangerous weapon” shall include objects that are designed or
intended to be used as a weapon, including those objects that are custom or homemade.
of 2